Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 6. Duties of Sheriffs.
§ 53.1-127.2.
Fees for electronic visitation and messaging with prisoners in local correctional facilities.

Each sheriff or jail superintendent who operates a correctional facility that utilizes an electronic visitation system or electronic messaging system, including Voice-over-Internet Protocol technology and web-based communication systems, for communication between prisoners and third parties is authorized to provide for the establishment and collection of a fee for the system utilized. However, no fee shall be charged for communication between prisoners and third parties within any local correctional facility or appurtenance thereto operated or controlled by the sheriff or jail superintendent.

This section does not apply to telephonic communication systems or to electronic video and audio communication systems used in judicial proceedings.

History.

2011, c. 532; 2013, c. 449.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 449, in the first paragraph, inserted “including Voice-over-Internet Protocol technology and web-based communication systems,” deleted the former second sentence which read: “The fee shall not exceed the actual costs of establishing and operating such a system and the proceeds may not be used for any purpose other than to offset the costs of establishing and operating a system,” and added the last sentence.

§ 53.1-127.3.
Deferred or installment payment agreement for unpaid fees.

If a person is unable to pay in full the fees owed to the local correctional facility or regional jail pursuant to §

53.1-131.3

, the sheriff or jail superintendent shall establish a deferred or installment payment agreement subject to the approval of the general district court. As a condition of every such agreement, a person who enters into a deferred or installment payment agreement shall promptly inform the sheriff or jail superintendent of any change of mailing address during the term of the agreement.

History.

2012, c. 829; 2020, cc. 740, 741.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 740 and 741, cl. 3 provides: “That the Governor shall provide the necessary certifications required pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 159(a)(3)(B) by September 21, 2020.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 740 and 741 are identical and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The sheriff or jail superintendent shall give notice to the person at the time the deferred or installment payment agreement is entered into and the person shall certify on a form prescribed by the local correctional facility or regional jail that he understands that upon his failure or refusal to pay in accordance with a deferred or installment payment agreement, the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended pursuant to the provisions of §

46.2-320.2

.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2540 Petition/Order: Installment Payment of Jail Fees.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Collection. —

Sheriff has discretion to determine what types of prisoner information he will release to a collection attorney under §

53.1-127.5

, but in all cases the release must not be otherwise prohibited by state or federal law and must be reasonably related to the collection effort. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ken Stolle, Sheriff, City of Virginia Beach, No. 14-082, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (7/8/15).

§ 53.1-127.4.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 740 and 741, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

53.1-127.4

, pertaining to suspension of privilege to operate motor vehicle for failure to pay fees, derived from Acts 2012, c. 829.

§ 53.1-127.5.
Collection of fees owed; contract for collection; duties of Department of Taxation.

The sheriff or jail superintendent may (i) contract with private attorneys or private collection agencies, (ii) enter into an agreement with a local governing body, or (iii) enter into an agreement with the county or city treasurer, upon such terms and conditions as may be established by guidelines promulgated by the Board, to collect fees imposed under §

53.1-131.3

. As part of such contract, private attorneys or collection agencies shall be given access to the social security number of the person who owes the fees in order to assist in the collection effort. Any such private attorney or collection agency shall be subject to the penalties and provisions of §

18.2-186.3

.

The fees of any private attorney or collection agency shall be paid on a contingency fee basis out of the proceeds of the amounts collected. However, in no event shall such attorney or collection agency receive a fee for amounts collected by the Department of Taxation under the Setoff Debt Collection Act (§

58.1-520

et seq.). A local treasurer undertaking collection pursuant to an agreement with the sheriff or jail superintendent may collect the administrative fee authorized by §

58.1-3958

.

History.

2012, c. 829.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Collection. —

Sheriff has discretion to determine what types of prisoner information he will release to a collection attorney under §

53.1-127.5

, but in all cases the release must not be otherwise prohibited by state or federal law and must be reasonably related to the collection effort. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ken Stolle, Sheriff, City of Virginia Beach, No. 14-082, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 13 (7/8/15).